Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.170

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

For purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Abortion" means any medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live birth.

(2) "*Advanced registered nurse practitioner" means an *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW.

(3) "Health care provider" means a person regulated under Title 18 RCW to practice health or health-related services or otherwise practicing health care services in this state consistent with state law.

(4) "Physician" means a physician licensed to practice under chapter 18.57 or 18.71 RCW in the state of Washington.

(5) "Physician assistant" means a physician assistant licensed to practice under chapter 18.71A RCW in the state of Washington.

(6) "Pregnancy" means the reproductive process beginning with the implantation of an embryo.

(7) "Private medical facility" means any medical facility that is not owned or operated by the state.

(8) "State" means the state of Washington and counties, cities, towns, municipal corporations, and quasi-municipal corporations in the state of Washington.

(9) "Viability" means the point in the pregnancy when, in the judgment of the physician, physician assistant, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice on the particular facts of the case before such physician, physician assistant, *advanced registered nurse practitioner, or other health care provider acting within the provider's scope of practice, there is a reasonable likelihood of the fetus's sustained survival outside the uterus without the application of extraordinary medical measures.

[2022 c 65 s 7; 1992 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

(2) The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Legislative affirmation—2022 c 65: See note following RCW 9.02.100.